Washington statutes.
RCW 35.58.585

Public transportation fares—Schedule of fines and penalties—Who may monitor fare payment—Administration of citations.

(1) Both a metropolitan municipal corporation and a city-owned transit system may establish, by resolution, a schedule of fines and penalties for civil infractions established in RCW 35.58.580. Fines established shall not exceed those imposed for class 1 infractions under RCW 7.80.120.

(2)(a) Both a metropolitan municipal corporation and a city-owned transit system may designate persons to monitor fare payment who are equivalent to, and are authorized to exercise all the powers of, an enforcement officer as defined in RCW 7.80.040. Both a metropolitan municipal corporation and a city-owned transit system may employ personnel to either monitor fare payment or contract for such services, or both.

(b) In addition to the specific powers granted to enforcement officers under RCW 7.80.050 and 7.80.060, persons designated to monitor fare payment may also take the following actions:

(i) Request proof of payment from passengers;

(ii) Request personal identification from a passenger who does not produce proof of payment when requested;

(iii) Issue a citation for a civil infraction established in RCW 35.58.580 conforming to the requirements established in RCW 7.80.070, except that the form for the notice of civil infraction must be approved by the administrative office of the courts and must not include vehicle information; and

(iv) Request that a passenger leave the bus or other mode of public transportation when the passenger has not produced proof of payment after being asked to do so by a person designated to monitor fare payment.

(3) Both a metropolitan municipal corporation and a city-owned transit system shall keep records of citations in the manner prescribed by RCW 7.80.150. All civil infractions established by this section and RCW 35.58.580 and 35.58.590 shall be heard and determined by a district court as provided in RCW 7.80.010 (1) and (4).

[ 2016 c 95 s 10; 2008 c 123 s 2.]

NOTES:

Intent—2016 c 95: See note following RCW 36.62.252.